Utah statutes.
41-1a-504.   Exceptions to title requirements for vehicles.

Each vehicle operated in this state is subject to the titling provisions of this part except:

(1)  special mobile equipment;

(2)  a vehicle owned or leased by the federal government;

(3)  a trailer of 750 pounds or less unladen weight and not designed, used, and maintained for hire for the transportation of property or persons; and

(4)  modular and prebuilt homes conforming to the Uniform Building Code and presently regulated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development that are not constructed on a permanent chassis.

